test/sample.metadix
    <pardef n="lui/re__vblex">
            <e r="LR"><p><l>rent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ra</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rai</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>raient</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rait</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ras</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>re</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>riez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>rons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ront</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>

<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>s</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>saient</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sais</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sait</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sant</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sant</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ses</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
<e><p><l>sez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>siez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>siez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sirent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sis</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sis</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sisse</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sissent</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sisses</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sissiez</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sissions</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sit</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
<e><p><l>sons</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sîmes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sît</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>sîtes</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>t</l><r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

                <pardef n="lu/i[]re__vblex">
   
<e>
     <p>
       <l>î</l>
       <r>i</r>
     </p>
     <i><prm/></i>
     <par n="luî/mes__vblex"/>
   </e>

<e>
     <i>i<prm/></i>
     <par n="lui/re__vblex"/>
   </e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex">

<e>
     <p>
       <l>è</l>
       <r>e</r>
     </p>
     <i><prm/></i>
     <par n="achèt/e__vblex"/>
   </e>

<e>
     <i>e<prm/></i>
      <par n="achet/er__vblex"/>
   </e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

          <e lm="détruire"><i>détru</i><par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm=""/></e>
          <e lm="enlever"><i>enl</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/></e>
          <e lm="acheter"><i>ach</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/></e>
          <e lm="amener"><i>am</i><par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/></e>
